Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3866
(UTC 801) Duty to administer trust.

(UTC 801) Upon acceptance of a trusteeship, the trustee shall administer the trust in good faith, in accordance with its terms and purposes and the interests of the beneficiaries, and in accordance with the Nebraska Uniform Trust Code.

Laws 2003, LB 130, § 66.

Upon acceptance of a trusteeship, a trustee has a duty to administer the trust in good faith, in accordance with its terms and purposes and the interests of the beneficiaries, and in accordance with the Nebraska Uniform Trust Code. In re William R. Zutavern Revocable Trust, 309 Neb. 542, 961 N.W.2d 807 (2021).

A reasonable person acting in good faith and in the interests of the beneficiaries would not wait until an annual report was due before informing the beneficiaries that the trust assets were in danger of being lost, but would instead inform the beneficiaries of the material facts immediately in order to allow them to protect their interests. Rafert v. Meyer, 290 Neb. 219, 859 N.W.2d 332 (2015).

In drafting a trust, an attorney cannot abrogate his or her duty to administer the trust in good faith, in accordance with its terms and purposes and the interests of the beneficiaries, and in accordance with the Nebraska Uniform Trust Code. Rafert v. Meyer, 290 Neb. 219, 859 N.W.2d 332 (2015).

The beneficiaries alleged sufficient facts for a court to find that the trustee acted in bad faith or reckless indifference to the purposes of the trust or the interests of the beneficiaries by providing a false address to the insurers of life insurance policies, which were the sole trust property. Rafert v. Meyer, 290 Neb. 219, 859 N.W.2d 332 (2015).